Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,148
Individual files; examination permitted.

Any applicant or recipient of assistance from a housing agency may examine his or her individual file or files at reasonable times and intervals.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 77.